Washington statutes.
RCW 18.110.040

Violations—Penalties—Attorney fees.

An art dealer violating RCW 18.110.030 is liable to the artist for fifty dollars plus actual damages, including incidental and consequential damages, sustained as a result of the violation. If an art dealer violates RCW 18.110.030, the artist's obligation for compensation to the art dealer is voidable. In an action under this section the court may, in its discretion, award the artist reasonable attorney's fees.

[ 1981 c 33 s 4.]